District of Columbia statutes.
2-592

Establishment of the District of Columbia Open Government Office.

The District of Columbia Open Government Office (“Open Government Office”) is established as an independent office within the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability to promote open governance in the District of Columbia. All assets, staff, and unexpended appropriations of the Open Government Office shall be transferred to the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 502
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(a)(1), 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01 and § 2-574.
D.C. Law 19-124 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“The District of Columbia Open Government Office (’Open Government Office’) is established as an independent agency to promote open governance in the District of Columbia.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(a)(1) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).